Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [115B.55] ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION; TAX-FORFEITED AND TAX-FORECLOSED PROPERTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin State-foreclosed properties cleanup grant program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must establish a program to award grants to counties to address blight conditions and remediate environmental contamination on tax-forfeited or tax-foreclosed properties. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible expenditure. new text end new text begin A grant awarded to a county under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) remediating contamination at tax-forfeited or tax-foreclosed properties; new text end new text begin (2) related testing and monitoring; or new text end new text begin (3) correcting blighted conditions at tax-forfeited or tax-foreclosed properties. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin A county seeking a grant under this section must file an application with the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The application must contain, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) a description of the property, including documentation of its public ownership; new text end new text begin (2) the results of any testing or monitoring indicating the presence of a hazardous substance or a pollutant or contaminant on the tax-forfeited or tax-foreclosed property or the reason for suspecting that a hazardous substance or a pollutant or contaminant is present on the tax-forfeited or tax-foreclosed property; new text end new text begin (3) proof of blight or substandard structures that create conditions of concern for public safety, health, and the environment; new text end new text begin (4) a proposed remediation plan describing any assessment and removal activities proposed; new text end new text begin (5) the estimated cost of the proposed remediation plan; new text end new text begin (6) the source and amount of any nongrant money that has been expended on maintenance, assessment, or emergency issues on the property or that will be contributed to the remediation plan; and new text end new text begin (7) any other information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Awarding grants. new text end new text begin In awarding grants under this section, the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) may modify a county's proposed remediation plan; new text end new text begin (2) must consider a county's ability to pay for implementing the remediation plan if it does not receive the grant; new text end new text begin (3) must consider funds already expended on the property for assessment, for maintenance, or to address emergency health or safety concerns; and new text end new text begin (4) must ensure that counties in all regions of the state benefit from the program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to award grants under section 115B.55. new text end